Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-52] General powers. Unless its
articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every corporation has perpetual
duration and succession in its corporate name and has the same powers as an
individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its affairs
including, without limitation, the power:

(1) To sue and be
sued, complain, and defend in its corporate name;

(2) To have a corporate seal, which may be altered at
will, and to use it, or a facsimile of it, by impressing or affixing or in any
other manner reproducing it;

(3) To make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with
its articles of incorporation or with the laws of the State, for regulating and
managing the affairs of the corporation;

(4) To purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire,
and own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal with, real or personal
property, or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

(5) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease,
exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property;

(6) To purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise
acquire, own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise
dispose of, and deal in and with, shares or other interests in, or obligations
of any entity;

(7) To make contracts and guaranties, incur
liabilities, borrow money, issue notes, bonds, and other obligations, and
secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property,
franchises, or income;

(8) To lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and
receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment, except
as limited by section 414D‑151;

(9) To be a promoter, partner, member, associate, or
manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or other entity;

(10) To conduct its activities, locate offices, and
exercise the powers granted by this chapter within or without this State;

(11) To elect or appoint directors, officers,
employees, and agents of the corporation, define their duties, and fix their
compensation;

(12) To pay pensions and establish pension plans,
pension trusts, and other benefit and incentive plans for any or all of its
current or former directors, officers, employees, and agents;

(13) To make donations not inconsistent with law for
the public welfare or for charitable, religious, scientific,
or educational purposes, and for other purposes that further the corporate
interest;

(14) To impose dues, assessments, admission, and
transfer fees upon its members;

(15) To establish conditions for admission of members,
admit members, and issue memberships;

(16) To carry on a business;

(17) To do all things necessary or convenient, not
inconsistent with law, to further the activities and affairs of the
corporation. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Cited: 655 F. Supp. 2d 1139 (2009).

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next